Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-149
Consolidation; securities; issuance; limitation.

The capital stock of a corporation formed by the merger or consolidation of two or more other corporations, shall not exceed the sum of the capital stock of the corporations so merged or consolidated at par value thereof, or such sum and any additional sum actually paid in cash; nor shall any contract, or consolidation or lease be capitalized in the stock of any corporation whatsoever; nor after October 19, 1963, shall any corporation issue any bonds against or as a lien upon any contract for consolidation or merger.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 49, p. 1373.